assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX I ollar uellas [^g]ollar
SFX I ollar ellas gollar
SFX I ollar uella [^g]ollar
SFX I ollar ella gollar
SFX I ollar uellan [^g]ollar
SFX I ollar ellan gollar
SFX I ollar uelle [^g]ollar
SFX I ollar elle gollar
SFX I ollar uelles [^g]ollar
SFX I ollar elles gollar
SFX I ollar uellen [^g]ollar
SFX I ollar ellen gollar
SFX I orar uero [^g]orar
SFX I orar ero gorar
SFX I orar ueras [^g]orar
SFX I orar eras gorar
SFX I orar uera [^g]orar
SFX I orar era gorar
SFX I orar ueran [^g]orar
SFX I orar eran gorar
SFX I orar uere [^g]orar
SFX I orar ere gorar
SFX I orar ueres [^g]orar
SFX I orar eres gorar
SFX I orar ueren [^g]orar
SFX I orar eren gorar
SFX I orzar uerzo orzar
SFX I orzar uerzas orzar
SFX I orzar uerza orzar
SFX I orzar uerzan orzar
SFX I orzar uerce orzar
SFX I orzar uerces orzar
SFX I orzar uercen orzar
SFX I oblar ueblo oblar
SFX I oblar ueblas oblar
SFX I oblar uebla oblar
SFX I oblar ueblan oblar
SFX I oblar ueble oblar
SFX I oblar uebles oblar
SFX I oblar ueblen oblar
SFX I ostrar uestro ostrar
SFX I ostrar uestras ostrar
SFX I ostrar uestra ostrar
SFX I ostrar uestran ostrar
SFX I ostrar uestre ostrar
SFX I ostrar uestres ostrar
SFX I ostrar uestren ostrar
SFX I ostar uesto ostar
SFX I ostar uestas ostar
SFX I ostar uesta ostar
SFX I ostar uestan ostar
SFX I ostar ueste ostar
SFX I ostar uestes ostar
SFX I ostar uesten ostar
SFX I obar uebo obar
SFX I obar uebas obar
SFX I obar ueba obar
SFX I obar ueban obar
SFX I obar uebe obar
SFX I obar uebes obar
SFX I obar ueben obar
SFX I onar ueno onar
SFX I onar uenas onar
SFX I onar uena onar
SFX I onar uenan onar
SFX I onar uene onar
SFX I onar uenes onar
SFX I onar uenen onar
SFX I onzar enzo gonzar
SFX I onzar enzas gonzar
SFX I onzar enza gonzar
SFX I onzar enzan gonzar
SFX I onzar ence gonzar
SFX I onzar ences gonzar
SFX I onzar encen gonzar
SFX I olgar uelgo olgar
SFX I olgar uelgas olgar
SFX I olgar uelga olgar
SFX I olgar uelgan olgar
SFX I olgar uelgue olgar
SFX I olgar uelgues olgar
SFX I olgar uelguen olgar
SFX I ontar uento ontar
SFX I ontar uentas ontar
SFX I ontar uenta ontar
SFX I ontar uentan ontar
SFX I ontar uente ontar
SFX I ontar uentes ontar
SFX I ontar uenten ontar
SFX I ovar uevo ovar
SFX I ovar uevas ovar
SFX I ovar ueva ovar
SFX I ovar uevan ovar
SFX I ovar ueve ovar
SFX I ovar ueves ovar
SFX I ovar ueven ovar
SFX I osar ueso osar
SFX I osar uesas osar
SFX I osar uesa osar
SFX I osar uesan osar
SFX I osar uese osar
SFX I osar ueses osar
SFX I osar uesen osar
SFX I oldar ueldo [^g]oldar
SFX I oldar eldo goldar
SFX I oldar ueldas [^g]oldar
SFX I oldar eldo goldar
SFX I oldar uelda [^g]oldar
SFX I oldar elda goldar
SFX I oldar ueldan [^g]oldar
SFX I oldar eldan goldar
SFX I oldar uelde [^g]oldar
SFX I oldar elde goldar
SFX I oldar ueldes [^g]oldar
SFX I oldar eldes goldar
SFX I oldar uelden [^g]oldar
SFX I oldar elden goldar
SFX I orcar uerco orcar
SFX I orcar uercas orcar
SFX I orcar uerca orcar
SFX I orcar uercan orcar
SFX I orcar uerque orcar
SFX I orcar uerques orcar
SFX I orcar uerquen orcar
SFX I ontrar uentro ontrar
SFX I ontrar uentras ontrar
SFX I ontrar uentra ontrar
SFX I ontrar uentran ontrar
SFX I ontrar uentre ontrar
SFX I ontrar uentres ontrar
SFX I ontrar uentren ontrar
SFX I odar uedo odar
SFX I odar uedas odar
SFX I odar ueda odar
SFX I odar uedan odar
SFX I odar uede odar
SFX I odar uedes odar
SFX I odar ueden odar
SFX I oar ueo oar
SFX I oar ueas oar
SFX I oar uea oar
SFX I oar uean oar
SFX I oar uee oar
SFX I oar uees oar
SFX I oar ueen oar
SFX I ortar uerto ortar
SFX I ortar uertas ortar
SFX I ortar uerta ortar
SFX I ortar uertan ortar
SFX I ortar uerte ortar
SFX I ortar uertes ortar
SFX I ortar uerten ortar
SFX I olcar uelco olcar
SFX I olcar uelcas olcar
SFX I olcar uelca olcar
SFX I olcar uelcan olcar
SFX I olcar uelque olcar
SFX I olcar uelques olcar
SFX I olcar uelquen olcar
SFX I ogar uego ogar
SFX I ogar uegas ogar
SFX I ogar uega ogar
SFX I ogar uegan ogar
SFX I ogar uegue ogar
SFX I ogar uegues ogar
SFX I ogar ueguen ogar
SFX I oltar uelto oltar
SFX I oltar ueltas oltar
SFX I oltar uelta oltar
SFX I oltar ueltan oltar
SFX I oltar uelte oltar
SFX I oltar ueltes oltar
SFX I oltar uelten oltar
SFX I untar nto untar
SFX I untar ntas untar
SFX I untar nta untar
SFX I untar ntan untar
SFX I untar nte untar
SFX I untar ntes untar
SFX I untar nten untar
SFX I usar so usar
SFX I usar sas usar
SFX I usar sa usar
SFX I usar san usar
SFX I usar se usar
SFX I usar ses usar
SFX I usar sen usar
SFX I cer zco [ae]cer
SFX I r s [ae]cer
SFX I r 0 [ae]cer
SFX I r n [ae]cer
SFX I cer zca [ae]cer
SFX I cer zcas [ae]cer
SFX I cer zcamos [ae]cer
SFX I cer zcis [ae]cer
SFX I cer zcan [ae]cer
SFX I cer zco nocer
SFX I r s nocer
SFX I r 0 nocer
SFX I r n nocer
SFX I cer zca nocer
SFX I cer zcas nocer
SFX I cer zcamos nocer
SFX I cer zcis nocer
SFX I cer zcan nocer
SFX I olver uelvo olver
SFX I olver uelves olver
SFX I olver uelve olver
SFX I olver uelven olver
SFX I olver uelva olver
SFX I olver uelvas olver
SFX I er amos [^aoc]er
SFX I er is [^aoc]er
SFX I olver uelvan olver
SFX I over uevo over
SFX I over ueves over
SFX I over ueve over
SFX I over ueven over
SFX I over ueva over
SFX I over uevas over
SFX I over uevan over
SFX I ocer uezo cocer
SFX I ocer ueces cocer
SFX I ocer uece cocer
SFX I ocer uecen cocer
SFX I ocer ueza cocer
SFX I ocer uezas cocer
SFX I cer zamos cocer
SFX I cer zis cocer
SFX I ocer uezan cocer
SFX I oler uelo oler
SFX I oler ueles oler
SFX I oler uele oler
SFX I oler uelen oler
SFX I oler uela oler
SFX I oler uelas oler
SFX I oler uelan oler
SFX I orcer uerzo orcer
SFX I orcer uerces orcer
SFX I orcer uerce orcer
SFX I orcer uercen orcer
SFX I orcer uerza orcer
SFX I orcer uerzas orcer
SFX I cer zamos orcer
SFX I cer zis orcer
SFX I orcer uerzan orcer
SFX I order uerdo order
SFX I order uerdes order
SFX I order uerde order
SFX I order uerden order
SFX I order uerda order
SFX I order uerdas order
SFX I order uerdan order
SFX I ender iendo ender
SFX I ender iendes ender
SFX I ender iende ender
SFX I ender ienden ender
SFX I ender ienda ender
SFX I ender iendas ender
SFX I ender iendan ender
SFX I eder iedo eder
SFX I eder iedes eder
SFX I eder iede eder
SFX I eder ieden eder
SFX I eder ieda eder
SFX I eder iedas eder
SFX I eder iedan eder
SFX I erder ierdo erder
SFX I erder ierdes erder
SFX I erder ierde erder
SFX I erder ierden erder
SFX I erder ierda erder
SFX I erder ierdas erder
SFX I erder ierdan erder
SFX I erter ierto erter
SFX I erter iertes erter
SFX I erter ierte erter
SFX I erter ierten erter
SFX I erter ierta erter
SFX I erter iertas erter
SFX I erter iertan erter
SFX I erner ierno erner
SFX I erner iernes erner
SFX I erner ierne erner
SFX I erner iernen erner
SFX I erner ierna erner
SFX I erner iernas erner
SFX I erner iernan erner
SFX I cer zgo yacer
SFX I cer go yacer
SFX I cer zga yacer
SFX I cer ga yacer
SFX I cer zgas yacer
SFX I cer gas yacer
SFX I cer zgamos yacer
SFX I cer zgis yacer
SFX I cer gis yacer
SFX I cer zgan yacer
SFX I cer gan yacer
SFX I er igo aer
SFX I r s aer
SFX I r 0 aer
SFX I r n aer
SFX I er iga aer
SFX I er igas aer
SFX I er igamos aer
SFX I er igis aer
SFX I er igan aer
SFX I er igo oer
SFX I er yo oer
SFX I r s oer
SFX I r 0 oer
SFX I r n oer
SFX I er iga oer
SFX I er ya oer
SFX I er igas oer
SFX I er yas oer
SFX I er igamos oer
SFX I er igis oer
SFX I er yis oer
SFX I er igan oer
SFX I er yan oer
SFX I ir go sir
SFX I ir es sir
SFX I ir e sir
SFX I ir en sir
SFX I ir ga sir
SFX I ir gas sir
SFX I ir gamos sir
SFX I ir gis sir
SFX I ir gan sir
SFX I ernir ierno ernir
SFX I ernir iernes ernir
SFX I ernir ierne ernir
SFX I ernir iernen ernir
SFX I ernir ierna ernir
SFX I ernir iernas ernir
SFX I ir amos [^cs]ir
SFX I ir is [^cs]ir
SFX I ernir iernan ernir
SFX I endir iendo endir
SFX I endir iendes endir
SFX I endir iende endir
SFX I endir ienden endir
SFX I endir ienda endir
SFX I endir iendas endir
SFX I endir iendan endir
SFX I ibir bo ibir
SFX I ibir bes ibir
SFX I ibir be ibir
SFX I ibir ben ibir
