assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
abnegar/IRAD
abravecer/IRDL
abstraer/XILD
acensuar/RDI
acertar/hRID
acrecentar/RDPI
adestrar/RDI
adolecer/IRDL
adormecer/RDPIL
adquirir/XDI
afeblecer/IRLD
agradecer/IRLPD
ahijar/hRDI
ahitar/hRID
ahumar/I
aislar/IRhD
alborecer/RILD
alentar/RhDI
almadiar/RDI
altivecer/RID
amarecer/RILD
amnistiar/RID
amohinar/RDI
amorecer/RLID
ampliar/ARDI
anochecer/RDILS
anticuar/DRI
aparecer/pAhDRIL
apostar/IRDE
aprobar/hRDAI
arborecer/RILD
aridecer/IRD
arriar/IRD
asentar/hRID
asolar/EPI
ataviar/RhDI
atenuar/RDIA
aterrar/REI
atestar/PBIA
atumultuar/I
aunar/RID
autografiar/RDI
avergonzar/RID
aviar/RhID
baraustar/RDI
bienquerer/DXIS
blanquecer/iRILPD
cabrahigar/RiDI
caligrafiar/RID
calosfriar/RDI
carecer/iRIPDL
cartografiar/RDI
cerner/RI
cimentar/hRID
circunvolar/RID
clocar/iIRaD
cohibir/RID
colicuecer/RDIL
compadecer/RILQD
complacer/RPLID
concertar/hRDI
condolecer/IRDL
confesar/RIDQ
consensuar/RDI
contar/hRID
continuar/IRhD
contrariar/RID
coreografiar/RDI
criar/RhIpjD
cuantiar/RaDI
defender/RILD
demasiar/RID
denostar/RDI
desafiar/RDI
desasosegar/RDI
desbravecer/RILD
descafeinar/RID
descender/RfILD
descontar/pRDI
descornar/RDI
desflocar/IRD
desmajolar/RID
desnegar/I
desoldar/I
desosar/I
despedrar/RID
despertar/RDIP
desraizar/DRI
desvanecer/RIDLP
desvergonzar/RDI
desvirtuar/RID
discerner/I
discordar/RID
displacer/RILD
distraer/XIPDL
doler/fDRLI
efectuar/RID
embarbecer/RLID
embastecer/RLDI
embebecer/hRLDI
embellecer/RLDPI
emblandecer/IRDL
embosquecer/RIDL
embrutecer/RDILP
empavorecer/IRLD
empequeecer/RILD
emplebeyecer/IRDL
empobrecer/RDLPI
emporcar/RDI
enaltecer/RLIDP
encabellecer/RILD
encalvecer/RDIL
encarecer/hRLDI
encender/RLIPD
encomendar/RDIP
encorar/RDI
encorecer/RIDL
encrudecer/RILD
endentecer/RILD
enfervorecer/RLID
enfierecer/RDIL
enfranquecer/IRLD
engaliar/RDI
engravecer/IRDL
engrumecer/IRDL
enlejiar/RID
enllentecer/IRDL
enloquecer/RIDPL
enmagrecer/RIDL
enmendar/RIDB
enmollecer/RDIL
enmugrecer/RIDL
ennudecer/RILD
enraizar/RID
enrigidecer/RILD
enrocar/RIED
enronquecer/IRPLD
enruinecer/RIDL
ensangrentar/RDIP
ensilvecer/RDIL
ensolver/IRLD
ensordecer/RPLID
enternecer/IRLDP
entesar/I
entigrecer/RLID
entorpecer/RDhIL
entrepernar/RID
entullecer/RDIL
envaguecer/RDLI
envejecer/RPIDL
envilecer/RPLDI
enzurdecer/RILD
escalecer/IRLD
escarmentar/IRD
esclarecer/RLIPD
escolar/RKDI
esgrafiar/RID
esperriar/RDI
esquiar/RID
estremecer/RPDIL
europeizar/RID
evanecer/IRDL
expiar/IRAD
extender/RQIDL
extraer/XLDI
fallecer/hRILPD
fenecer/RPIDL
fluctuar/RAID
fortalecer/hRDIL
fosforecer/RILD
fotolitografiar/RID
frutecer/RDIL
gloriar/RID
graduar/RDIA
guarecer/RILD
guiar/RIQD
hacendar/RDI
hebraizar/RDI
helar/RhDI
herbar/RhID
hermanecer/RILD
herventar/RID
holgar/RDI
humedecer/hDRIpL
individuar/RDI
infatuar/RID
inhestar/RI
insinuar/RIDA
inventariar/RDI
jipiar/RID
languidecer/RID
liar/hRaDI
litografiar/RID
llover/RDLI
lozanecer/RLID
malcriar/RDI
malquerer/XID
mancornar/RDI
mecanografiar/DRI
menstruar/IRAD
mimeografiar/RID
mohecer/aIRiLD
morder/DRPLIB
mover/pRIoaDfL
negrecer/LRgiID
obedecer/hRLDI
obscurecer/RIPDL
onecer/RILD
pacer/pRLID
paliar/RDI
parahusar/RID
pensar/RDIPQ
perecer/hDRI
perniquebrar/RID
pertenecer/RILD
pimpollecer/RILD
placer/hRaDIL
plegar/RpDI
podrecer/iRDLI
preceptuar/RDI
probar/aRpDAI
prohibir/RIAD
puar/RDI
quebrar/pRDI
radiografiar/RDI
raer/RILBDP
recentar/RIBD
recordar/RIDA
redituar/RDI
reenviar/RDI
regimentar/RID
rehilar/IP
rehusar/RID
reinar/REDI
remendar/IRD
renegar/gIRD
repensar/RI
rescontrar/RDI
resollar/RDI
resplandecer/RDLIP
restablecer/RLIDP
retentar/I
retraducir/XI
retrotraer/XDIL
reuntar/I
reventar/I
rociar/IRPDB
roer/RIfDLE
rujiar/RID
sainar/RgDI
sarmentar/iRDI
seer/rI
sembrar/pRIrD
sentar/aPRID
situar/IRAD
sobresolar/I
soltar/DRI
sonrodar/RDI
sorregar/RID
substraer/XIDL
tallecer/iRLDpI
tardecer/RLaID
telegrafiar/RDI
templar/BIRPED
terrecer/RDIL
tostar/RpDI
traer/XDABIL
transcender/RLID
trascolar/RDI
trasegar/IRD
trasparecer/RIDL
trasvolar/RID
triar/RID
tropezar/DRIB
usufructuar/DRI
valuar/aRgpDI
veer/oI
volar/RrIpD
volver/gRIL
yacer/RIsLD
